ukrainian/test2.aff
SFX j Y 421
SFX j у и .
SFX j и ів .
SFX j е ів .
SFX j о ими .
SFX j ні ням .
SFX j ю й .
SFX j ві ву .
SFX j й єш .
SFX j ка ко .
SFX j ім істю .
SFX j им осте .
SFX j ла лось .
SFX j ості ій .
SFX j уться етесь .
SFX j емося ешся .
SFX j еться ешся .
SFX j лося ли .
SFX j лися ло .
SFX j тися ла .
SFX j лася ли .
SFX j вшись ли .
SFX j ються єтесь .
SFX j ється йтесь .
SFX j ймося ємось .
SFX j ймось єтесь .
SFX j ємося ймось .
SFX j ємось йтесь .
SFX j вав ймо .
SFX j емось усь .
SFX j атись алось .
SFX j алось атись .
SFX j ався алось .
SFX j них ності .
SFX j на ність .
SFX j ної ність .
SFX j ались атись .
SFX j алась атися .
SFX j шся мся .
SFX j всь тимемся .
SFX j теся сь .
SFX j муть метеся .
SFX j етесь уть .
SFX j атимеш ало .
SFX j єш ймось .
SFX j уся у .
SFX j ують ували .
SFX j ність ною .
SFX j є ватиму .
SFX j тимемся вшись .
SFX j йтесь юсь .
SFX j єтесь йся .
SFX j мусь мемо .
SFX j мем мусь .
SFX j ків кам .
SFX j йся єте .
SFX j юся йте .
SFX j йсь валися .
SFX j юсь валися .
SFX j анням ало .
SFX j ння тимешся .
SFX j чись ся .
SFX j ці цях .
SFX j тів там .
SFX j рів рах .
SFX j ають айте .
SFX j ам овому .
SFX j ах ної .
SFX j ом овій .
SFX j вої м .
SFX j ова у .
SFX j ових ом .
SFX j итись илось .
SFX j илось итись .
SFX j та тим .
SFX j ився илось .
SFX j ились итись .
SFX j илась итися .
SFX j иться илось .
SFX j имося илась .
SFX j имось ились .
SFX j ців цях .
SFX j ннях тиму .
SFX j итесь ився .
SFX j нь в .
SFX j нів нам .
SFX j ив илась .
SFX j юють ювали .
SFX j ок ом .
SFX j иш іть .
SFX j ської ці .
SFX j ські ці .
SFX j чів чах .
SFX j ші стю .
SFX j ша сть .
SFX j шої сть .
SFX j іших істю .
SFX j іться ись .
SFX j яться имося .
SFX j ник ні .
SFX j ських ами .
SFX j ицях иками .
SFX j остях ої .
SFX j ить еній .
SFX j ицям иках .
SFX j ять енім .
SFX j дів дах .
SFX j лі лими .
SFX j остям у .
SFX j ця ського .
SFX j імося ившись .
SFX j імось имось .
SFX j імся и .
SFX j іть имося .
SFX j вість вих .
SFX j цем ській .
SFX j тва ькими .
SFX j ць м .
SFX j сів сам .
SFX j ії ам .
SFX j ія ічної .
SFX j лів лам .
SFX j нув німо .
SFX j рі рного .
SFX j мі мо .
SFX j мів мах .
SFX j чі че .
SFX j ча нням .
SFX j тої тість .
SFX j тих тосте .
SFX j ачем альними .
SFX j іях ійне .
SFX j яють явши .
SFX j ач атимете .
SFX j ра рним .
SFX j гів гам .
SFX j іють ієте .
SFX j р рськім .
SFX j енням имо .
SFX j явся ялось .
SFX j ятись ялось .
SFX j ялось ятись .
SFX j ялись ятись .
SFX j ялась ятися .
SFX j тість тої .
SFX j яв ятимуть .
SFX j т тського .
SFX j зів зам .
SFX j н нкою .
SFX j аться имося .
SFX j лої ли .
SFX j ді до .
SFX j ятимеш яймо .
SFX j итимеш ило .
SFX j утись улось .
SFX j улось утись .
SFX j неш атимемо .
SFX j увся улось .
SFX j улись утись .
SFX j улась утися .
SFX j ать уватиму .
SFX j цької кові .
SFX j нуть аймо .
SFX j лих лості .
SFX j аціям уватиме .
SFX j цькі кові .
SFX j ьої і .
SFX j нцях нського .
SFX j пів пам .
SFX j зі ги .
SFX j нися нулась .
SFX j нись нулися .
SFX j нусь німся .
SFX j нцям нськім .
SFX j цьких кам .
SFX j лість лої .
SFX j фів фам .
SFX j ева ів .
SFX j вів вах .
SFX j ичем ою .
SFX j вцях вського .
SFX j ич ого .
SFX j сі ху .
SFX j зм чного .
SFX j жусь женою .
SFX j ьмося яться .
SFX j га гічний .
SFX j ьмось имося .
SFX j вцям вським .
SFX j кість ких .
SFX j чусь ченою .
SFX j іїв іям .
SFX j ьтесь илася .
SFX j янням явши .
SFX j бів бам .
SFX j ітимеш іло .
SFX j істі ізм .
SFX j інням имо .
SFX j да дній .
SFX j инях ічний .
SFX j лива нім .
SFX j уті улась .
SFX j ливих ного .
SFX j евих ів .
SFX j г гині .
SFX j гиням гами .
SFX j иня ічне .
SFX j исті ові .
SFX j тав чіть .
SFX j хів хам .
SFX j уваті о .
SFX j єм єва .
SFX j єва ю .
SFX j енької ого .
SFX j енькі ими .
SFX j бі бо .
SFX j йцях йського .
SFX j жів жам .
SFX j кав кувала .
SFX j ід одів .
SFX j ов и .
SFX j чик ах .
SFX j еньких ій .
SFX j лях льні .
SFX j с сова .
SFX j євих ї .
SFX j йцям йськім .
SFX j фа фіє .
SFX j чої ці .
SFX j чав чите .
SFX j лям ллю .
SFX j очеш отавши .
SFX j ітись ілося .
SFX j ілось ітись .
SFX j чих цях .
SFX j івся ілось .
SFX j шусь шеною .
SFX j л ловім .
SFX j пі по .
SFX j ілись ітись .
SFX j ілась ітися .
SFX j очуть отали .
SFX j щі щому .
SFX j рем рськім .
SFX j ма мний .
SFX j з тичної .
SFX j ща щих .
SFX j лем льний .
SFX j тв ьке .
SFX j вик ві .
SFX j за зний .
SFX j са сового .
SFX j шав вши .
SFX j щусь ститеся .
SFX j льцях лець .
SFX j ж жувала .
SFX j пав пувала .
SFX j дь дитись .
SFX j чися ченому .
SFX j жі жному .
SFX j юк ову .
SFX j рях рко .
SFX j рям рських .
SFX j тті ватимеш .
SFX j жмося жся .
SFX j жмось жимось .
SFX j ль лив .
SFX j чук івки .
SFX j тик том .
SFX j шів шам .
SFX j ття тій .
SFX j ищем ах .
SFX j ттям тої .
SFX j ря рські .
SFX j жтесь жившись .
SFX j дься дилось .
SFX j ба бій .
SFX j вмося вились .
SFX j вмось вилось .
SFX j втесь вимось .
SFX j иті иваєшся .
SFX j чмося чуся .
SFX j стись лися .
SFX j чмось чимось .
SFX j чість чої .
SFX j па пія .
SFX j чтесь чилась .
SFX j зав зувала .
SFX j жся жилось .
SFX j чся чилося .
SFX j ля льок .
SFX j жем жний .
SFX j фі мою .
SFX j їш юванням .
SFX j п пічній .
SFX j їмося яться .
SFX j еїв ей .
SFX j їть ювалися .
SFX j бав бувала .
SFX j ївся їлось .
SFX j ф ми .
SFX j їться ївшись .
SFX j їтись їлось .
SFX j їлось їтись .
SFX j жуть заному .
SFX j дися дженого .
SFX j їлись їтись .
SFX j їлась їтися .
SFX j їмось їлася .
SFX j рцях рського .
SFX j жеш завши .
SFX j хав хнімо .
SFX j анті увало .
SFX j мої мість .
SFX j мих мосте .
SFX j рися реного .
SFX j оїв оєм .
SFX j ьцям ьськими .
SFX j жав жувавши .
SFX j дись дженім .
SFX j дуть детесь .
SFX j рмося рилися .
SFX j рмось рилося .
SFX j ртесь ритись .
SFX j жися жетеся .
SFX j рцям рськім .
SFX j іва овим .
SFX j ха нові .
SFX j гтись глося .
SFX j глось гтися .
SFX j літніх річним .
SFX j рись ремось .
SFX j чям не .
SFX j гав гнімо .
SFX j їтесь ївсь .
SFX j глись гтися .
SFX j рся ришся .
SFX j дав сти .
SFX j ччя чну .
SFX j ісінькі енькими .
SFX j аїв аях .
SFX j ищ івських .
SFX j жись жіть .
SFX j мість мої .
SFX j дцях дськими .
SFX j кціям кторів .
SFX j як юкові .
SFX j деш датимем .
SFX j ріям рного .
SFX j лься ляться .
SFX j оті атимуть .
SFX j пися пімо .
SFX j дусь демо .
SFX j яціям юватиму .
SFX j шися шеними .
SFX j пись пленім .
SFX j рав ваймо .
SFX j иють иємо .
SFX j дцям дській .
SFX j фіям фах .
SFX j сінької шими .
SFX j ьнях ось .
SFX j лють леш .
SFX j льням вши .
SFX j ак иком .
SFX j часті ного .
SFX j б бкою .
SFX j льня ли .
SFX j реш руться .
SFX j глась гаємось .
SFX j рої рість .
SFX j рих росте .
SFX j сіньких шій .
SFX j екті єктах .
SFX j єкті ектах .
SFX j русь решся .
SFX j нься нулось .
SFX j киням ками .
SFX j сав шіть .
SFX j сися шусь .
SFX j шеш шу .
SFX j руть ре .
SFX j сись шенім .
SFX j вися вленого .
SFX j шуть санім .
SFX j клись четься .
SFX j клось четься .
SFX j ктись четься .
SFX j клась чуться .
SFX j гшись гаючись .
SFX j жа жою .
SFX j нав раєте .
SFX j ік іє .
SFX j яті явшись .
SFX j 'їв 'ю .
SFX j ддям дний .
SFX j їд вими .
SFX j вись вавшись .
SFX j гся гались .
SFX j єнням юватись .
SFX j гіям гах .
SFX j еням івську .
SFX j рнях рськими .
SFX j рість рої .
SFX j іті овими .
SFX j ськ щ .
SFX j еня овою .
SFX j ддя дну .
SFX j рня рські .
SFX j утимеш ула .
SFX j мав мувала .
SFX j щав щу .
SFX j щів щах .
SFX j піям пах .
SFX j рням рський .
SFX j отись олися .
SFX j олись отися .
SFX j літня тисячна .
SFX j ртись рлась .
SFX j рлись ртися .
SFX j рлось ртися .
SFX j рлась ршись .
